src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON CIEZAS ! Collective numerals
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ijs K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
 +Sg+Nom: PxC ;
 +CmpN/SgG:a R ;  !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG: R ;  !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen: PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc: PxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:asa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom:ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Loc:istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com:ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com:ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON VIDAS ! Collective numerals
 +N+Coll+Sg+Nom:đas%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Ess:đas%>in K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:httas%>a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:httas%> K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:httas%>a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:httas%> K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:httas%>at K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:httas%>ij K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:httas%>is K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:httas%>in K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com:httas%>ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:httas%>iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:httas%>iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:httas%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:httas%>ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:httas%>ijs K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com:httas%>ijgujn K ;
 +Sg+Nom:httas%> PxC ;
 +CmpN/SgG:httas%>a R ;  !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG:httas%> R ;  !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen:httas%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:httas%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:httas%>asa PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom:httas%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Loc:httas%>istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com:httas%>ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom:httas%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Gen:httas%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc:httas%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill:httas%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:httas%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com:httas%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;



! Imprecise numbers
! -----------------

LEXICON BEANNOT
+Ess:nubbi%>n K ;
+Sg+Gen:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Gen:nubbi%>X4X7»# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill:nubbi%>X3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:nubbi%>X4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub+Use/NG:nubbi%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:nubbi%>X5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:nubbi%>X4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen:nubbi%>X5jd9»# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:nubbi%>X5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:nubbi%>X5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:nubbi%>X5jgujn K ;


! Arabic numerals
! ---------------


LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES 
 §+Use/Circ:§       ARABIC ; ! §24
 §§+Use/Circ:§§     ARABIC ; ! §§24
 §% +Use/Circ:§%    ARABIC ; ! § 24
 §§% +Use/Circ:§§%  ARABIC ; ! §§ 24
 %-+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC ; ! -24
 %‒+Use/Circ:%‒ ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2012
 %–+Use/Circ:%– ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2013
 %—+Use/Circ:%— ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2014
 %―+Use/Circ:%― ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2015
 %++Use/Circ:%+ ARABIC ; ! <plus>24
 %-% +Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC ; ! - 24
 %‒% +Use/Circ:%‒%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2012
 %–% +Use/Circ:%–%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2013
 %—% +Use/Circ:%—%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2014
 %―% +Use/Circ:%―%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2015
 %+% +Use/Circ:%+%  ARABIC ; ! <plus> 24
 %*+Use/Circ:%* ARABIC ; ! *24
 %$+Use/Circ:%$ ARABIC ; ! $24
 %€+Use/Circ:%€ ARABIC ; ! €24
 %<+Use/Circ:%[%<%] ARABIC ; ! <24
 %>+Use/Circ:%[%>%] ARABIC ; ! >24
 s%.+Use/Circ:s%. ARABIC ; ! s.24

LEXICON ARABIC
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOP ;
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPORD ;
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPCOLL ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOP
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;
 %-+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC ; ! 1-2 multipart numbers 
 %–+Use/Circ:%– ARABIC ; ! 1–2 multipart numbers 
 %—+Use/Circ:%— ARABIC ; ! 1—2 multipart numbers 
 %.%-+Use/Circ:%.%- ARABIC ; ! 1.-2 multipart numbers ! !
 %.%–+Use/Circ:%.%– ARABIC ; ! 1.–2 multipart numbers ! !
 %.%—+Use/Circ:%.%— ARABIC ; ! 1.—2 multipart numbers ! !
 %-% +Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC ; ! 1- 2 multipart numbers 
 %–% +Use/Circ:%–%  ARABIC ; ! 1– 2 multipart numbers 
 %—% +Use/Circ:%—%  ARABIC ; ! 1— 2 multipart numbers 
 % %-+Use/Circ:% %- ARABIC ; ! 1 -2 multipart numbers 
 % %–+Use/Circ:% %– ARABIC ; ! 1 –2 multipart numbers 
 % %—+Use/Circ:% %— ARABIC ; ! 1 —2 multipart numbers 
 % %-% +Use/Circ:% %-%  ARABIC ; ! 1 - 2 multipart numbers 
 % %–% +Use/Circ:% %–%  ARABIC ; ! 1 – 2 multipart numbers 
 % %—% +Use/Circ:% %—%  ARABIC ; ! 1 — 2 multipart numbers 
 % %-%-% +Use/Circ:% %-%-%  ARABIC ; ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers 
 % %–%–% +Use/Circ:% %–%–%  ARABIC ; ! 1 –– 2 multipart numbers 
 % %—%—% +Use/Circ:% %—%—%  ARABIC ; ! 1 —— 2 multipart numbers 
 %.+Use/Circ:%. ARABIC ; 
 %:+Use/Circ:%: ARABIC ; 
 %,+Use/Circ:%, ARABIC ; 
 % +Use/Circ:%  ARABIC ; ! Allowing for "23 500". 
   +Use/Circ:  ARABIC ; ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char = alt-space)
 %/+Use/Circ:%/ ARABIC ; ! 24/12
 %/% +Use/Circ:%/%  ARABIC ; ! 24/ 12
 % %/+Use/Circ:% %/ ARABIC ; ! 24 /12
 '+Use/Circ:'7 ARABIC ; ! Since ' denotes cons.grad. This is not optimal either.
 
 +Num+Use/Circ: RNum ; ! Num Cmp Noun, with hyphen
 
 ,%-+Num+Use/Circ:,%- ARABICCASES ; ! 10,-
 ,%-+Num+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:.%- ARABICCASES ; ! 10.- It is wrong, but written.
 
  % %-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:% %- ARABICDELIMITER; ! 1 - multipart numbers - "1 -:s"?
  % %-%-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:% %-%- ARABICDELIMITER; ! 1 -- multipart numbers
  %%+Use/Circ:%%  ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".
  % %%+Use/Circ:% %%  ARABICDELIMITER ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.
  ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD
 +A+Ord+Attr:%. # ;
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITERORD ;
 < [a|b|c|d|e|f|f %  f] > ACASETAG ;

LEXICON ACASETAG  ! 1e+Num+Sg+Num:1e
+Num: ARABICCASES ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPCOLL
 +N+Coll+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITERCOLL ;


LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER ! blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer?
 +Num:           ARABICCASE0 ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
 +Num:%:         ARABICCASE  ; ! This is the 1984:s case.
 +Num+Use/Sub:   ARABICCASE  ; ! This is the 1984s case.
 +Num+Use/Sub:'7 ARABICCASE  ; ! This is the 1984's case. 
 +Num+Use/Sub:’  ARABICCASE  ; ! optio-B07 = ’
 +Num+Use/Sub:%- ARABICCASE  ; ! This is the 1984-s case. 
 +Num:%- NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! 6-jáhkasaš 
 +Num+Use/Sub:´  ARABICCASE  ; ! This is the 1984´s case.


LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD
!            ARABICCASE0   ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
:%:         ARABICCASEORD ; ! This is the 1984:s case.
 +Use/Sub:   ARABICCASEORD ; ! This is the 1984s case. 
 +Use/Sub:'7 ARABICCASEORD ; ! This is the 1984's case. 
 +Use/Sub:%- ARABICCASEORD ; ! This is the 1984-s case. 

LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERCOLL
!            ARABICCASE0    ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
:%:         ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984:s case. 
 +Use/Sub:   ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984s case. 
 +Use/Sub:'7 ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984's case. 
 +Use/Sub:%- ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984-s case. 

LEXICON ARABICCASES ! to distinguish between 0 and oblique
ARABICCASE0 ;
ARABICCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0
 +Sg+Nom: # ;
 +Sg+Gen: # ;
 +Sg+Acc: # ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr: # ;
 +Sg+Loc+Attr: # ;

LEXICON num-imprecise
beannot+Num:beal# BEANNOT ;
